Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.550

Chart order as prescription—Long-term care facilities and hospice programs.

(1) A chart order must be considered a prescription if it contains:

(a) The full name of the patient;

(b) The date of issuance;

(c) The name, strength, and dosage form of the drug prescribed;

(d) Directions for use; and

(e) An authorized signature. The order must contain the prescribing practitioner's signature or the signature of the practitioner's authorized agent, including the name of the prescribing practitioner.

(2) A licensed nurse, pharmacist, or physician practicing in a long-term care facility or hospice program may act as the practitioner's agent for purposes of this chapter, without need for a written agency agreement, to document a chart order in the patient's medical record on behalf of the prescribing practitioner pending the prescribing practitioner's signature; or to communicate a prescription to a pharmacy whether telephonically, via facsimile, or electronically. The communication of a prescription to a dispenser by the prescriber's agent has the same force and effect as if communicated directly by the authorized practitioner.

(3) Nothing in this chapter prevents an authorized credentialed employee of a long-term care facility from transmitting a chart order pursuant to RCW 74.42.230, or transmitting a prescription on behalf of a resident to the extent otherwise authorized by law.

[ 2020 c 57 s 27; 2016 c 148 s 2.]